src/scripts/Albanian/numbers.foma
define NumberRules SeparatePowerOfThousand(thns)  .o. 
 SeparatePowerOfThousand(mlns) .o. 
SeparatePowerOfThousand(blns) .o. 
SeparatePowerOfThousand(tlns)  .o. 
RemoveSilentGroups .o. 
SeparateHundreds  .o. 
SeparateTens  .o. 
    #MarkOrdPowerOfThousand .o.
 MarkTeens  
 .o. InsertAnds 
   .o.  RemoveZeros  .o. 
 PowerOfThousandSymbolsToSingular .o. 
 preTranslate
#.o. RemoveOnes  .o. 
 .o. processOrdinals
 .o.  [%.|%,|wnum] -> zero ... || .#. _   # hack to replace lost zero in front of dec. point
 .o. Translate   .o. [ [ord OrdSuffix]:0 -> || wnum _ .#. ]
 .o. [ Hm:e -> || _ ]
 .o. 	[dp:0|dec:0|wnum:0] -> || _ 
 ;
	

source romans.foma
regex ConvertRomanToDecimal .o. [ArabicNumber | Time] .o. tagRules
  .o. NumberRules 
 ; 
